Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-692
Failure to satisfy judgment; effect.

When any person fails within thirty working days to satisfy any judgment imposed for any traffic infraction, it shall be the duty of the clerk of the court in which such judgment is rendered within this state to transmit a copy of such judgment to the Department of Motor Vehicles as provided in section 60-4,100.

Laws 1973, LB 45, § 110;

Laws 1991, LB 420, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,1992, § 39-6,110;

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 188;

Laws 2017, LB259, § 14.